Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1
COLORADO COMMISSION ON THE AGING

26-11-100.1. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Older Coloradans' Act".

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 974, § 1, effective May 29.

26-11-100.2. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Older Coloradans constitute a fundamental resource of this state. Often, their competence, experience, and wisdom are underutilized, and a means must be found to effectively use their abilities for the benefit of all Coloradans. The number of persons in this state sixty years of age or older is increasing rapidly, and, of these persons, the number of women, people of color, and persons seventy-five years of age or older is expanding at an even greater rate.

A state that is well-adapted for aging is one where all individuals can thrive and are adequately supported: A Colorado for all. Colorado must support a high quality of life for older Coloradans and their families by promoting health and well-being; supporting affordable, high-quality, and sustainable long-term services and supports; fostering workforce development and self-sufficiency; creating livable communities; and integrating aging policy and programs across state government.

To ensure that Colorado is the best state in which to grow old, the following goals must guide aging and aging services in Colorado:

Older Coloradans are able to live and fully participate in their communities of choice for as long as possible;

Older Coloradans are able to stay engaged in the labor force or volunteer sector for as long as they want or need;

Older Coloradans and their families are financially secure and prepared to meet the challenges of aging;

Coloradans are prepared for the challenges of caring for aged loved ones and are able to do so without endangering their own physical, behavioral, and financial health or well-being or the health and well-being of their loved ones;

Trained workers are skilled, educated, and paid commensurate to their abilities and training to meet the needs of employers and industries serving an increasing population of older Coloradans;

Older Coloradans can stay healthier longer through access to quality and affordable person-centered and culturally appropriate care that aligns with their preferences and values;

The state can meet its commitment to support older Coloradans and their families; and

Colorado can empower and protect older Coloradans from abuse, neglect, exploitation, and other harmful acts;

Colorado faces a historic demographic shift over the next fifty years that will create opportunities and challenges. This shift will result in an unprecedented number of older workers remaining in the workforce and older Coloradans shifting into retirement. The demographic changes will result in wide-ranging economic and social impacts on the workforce, housing, transportation, long-term services and supports, and health care. The state must act to capitalize on the opportunities and address the challenges.

To ensure that older Coloradans are prepared to address aging-related opportunities and challenges, it is critical that the state empower and educate residents from an early age to prepare for the realities of a long life. The state should encourage residents to engage in retirement planning, health and wellness preservation activities and services, lifelong learning, cross-generational collaboration, and civic engagement.

Aging is a personal experience that varies from person to person. Coloradans will age differently, with some remaining mentally and physically capable until they die and others experiencing mental and physical disabilities earlier in life. As a result, older Coloradans and their families are presented with varying opportunities and challenges across their lives. Some older Coloradans will continue to live independently in their own homes while others will require long-term skilled nursing care. In coordination with state department subject matter experts, area agencies on aging, local governments, and community stakeholders, it is a priority of the general assembly to examine the complexity of these issues and develop policies that support communities and families across Colorado. The aging process is further impacted by historical disparities, including but not limited to structural racism, sexism, and ageism. The social and health problems of older Coloradans are compounded by limited preparation for an increase in life expectancy and lack of access to services, or the unavailability of services, throughout the state. It is of profound importance for all Coloradans that older Coloradans maintain self-sufficiency and personal well-being, have access to necessary services and supports, and realize their maximum potential as creative and productive individuals.

Therefore, the general assembly finds that it is Colorado's policy to:

Empower and protect older Coloradans from abuse, neglect, exploitation, and other harmful acts;

Meaningfully involve older Coloradans in the planning and operation of all programs and services that may affect them;

Encourage agencies at all levels of government, as well as the private sector, to develop alternative services and forms of care that provide a range of services to be delivered in the community and home that support independent living and prevent unnecessary institutionalization;

Reduce health disparities and support aging across an individual's lifespan;

Prioritize planning services and programs for older Coloradans with the greatest economic or social needs;

Acknowledge and remove barriers to ensure programs, services, projects, policies, procedures, and resources are inclusive of all older Coloradans, particularly those who are most underserved;

Recognize that preparing all Coloradans for the different facets of a longer life is part of the state's responsibility; and

Facilitate and encourage joint program planning and policy development among state, regional, and local government to promote innovation, efficiency, and maximize resources;

In order to support older Coloradans, the general assembly finds that a citizen-led, multidisciplinary stakeholder commission, comprised of representatives from both the public and private sectors, is needed to coordinate and contribute to guiding state programs, services, projects, policies, procedures, and resources in the area of aging.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 974, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 193, § 1, effective March 24.

26-11-101. Commission on the aging - created - definition.

There is created in the state department the Colorado commission on the aging, referred to in this article 11 as the "commission", for the purpose of coordinating and guiding the implementation of the strategic action plan on aging, developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to June 30, 2022, and other strategies the commission may identify that support older Coloradans. The commission is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105. The commission shall consist of nineteen members who must be appointed as follows:

One member from the Colorado senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

One member from the Colorado house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

Seventeen members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, as follows:

One member from each congressional district of the state;

One member who is a representative of higher education or the Colorado community college system;

One member who is a director of an area agency on aging, as described in section 26-11-204;

One member with extensive knowledge of workforce issues impacting older Coloradans;

One member who represents a long-term residential care setting;

One member who represents Coloradans living with dementia;

One member who represents an organization providing home- and community-based services;

One member with extensive knowledge of or experience with transportation infrastructure and services;

One member who represents the housing sector; and

One member of the public policy or elder law community with extensive knowledge of and experience with aging policy or elder rights issues.

In making appointments pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(III) of this section, the governor shall appoint no more than a minimum majority of commission members affiliated with the same political party. In making appointments, the governor shall select:

Members who represent diverse racial, cultural, socioeconomic, gender, and ability groups, and individuals receiving community-based social or medical services that support independent living;

For the congressional district members, at least one member who is sixty years of age or older, or who is a person living with a disability, or who has a family member living with a disability;

At least one member who represents rural or frontier areas of the state;

At least one representative from a local government; and

At least one representative of the business community in order to consider the potential for initiatives developed in the private, for-profit sector.

Appointments to the commission must comply with the rules promulgated by the United States department of health and human services pursuant to the federal "Older Americans Comprehensive Services Amendments of 1973", Pub.L. 93-29, as amended.

A minimum majority of the commission members shall be appointed for an initial term of two years each, and the remaining commission members shall be appointed for an initial term of three years each. The governor shall indicate whether the appointed person is serving a two-year term or a three-year term. Appointments made after the expiration of the initial term are three-year terms. If a vacancy on the commission occurs, the governor shall appoint a new member from the appropriate representative group to serve the remainder of the member's term. No member may serve more than two full consecutive terms.

The terms of present members appointed pursuant to this section expire on August 31, 2022. The governor shall appoint new members pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, and the appointments are effective September 1, 2022.

As used in this section, "minimum majority" means the lowest number of members that is more than half of all commission members.

Source:

L. 73:

RC&RE, p. 1207, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-7-1.

L. 76:

(1) amended, p. 669, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1365, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 357, § 18, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 946, § 8, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1281), ch. 399, p. 2155, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 196, § 2, effective March 24; IP(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1209), ch. 95, p. 454, § 3, effective April 12; (1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3377, § 71, effective August 10.

26-11-102. Organization of commission.

The commission shall elect an executive committee from its membership, including a chair, a vice-chair, and such other officers as it deems necessary. The vice-chair shall act as chair in the absence of or at the direction of the chair. The commission shall meet in person or virtually on call of the chair but not less than once a month. A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. The executive committee is responsible for coordinating with the state office on aging established in section 26-11-202, relevant state agencies, and members of the general assembly.

The commission may establish standing subcommittees to support the implementation of the strategic action plan on aging, developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to June 30, 2022, and work related to the lifelong Colorado initiative established in part 3 of this article 11. The subcommittee topics may include, but are not limited to:

Workforce opportunities for older Coloradans;

The direct-care workforce;

Housing options for older Coloradans;

Age-friendly, affordable, and livable communities;

Health care;

Chronic disease prevention and maintenance;

Behavioral health;

Lifelong learning;

Retirement security;

Legislative and local government affairs;

Transportation;

Disparities among older Coloradans;

Elder rights; and

Innovation and technology.

Each standing subcommittee must be chaired by a member of the commission but may include membership beyond commission members, including members of the general public who volunteer to participate in a specific subcommittee. Noncommission members may be co-chairs or vice-chairs. The membership selection process may be determined in the commission bylaws.

Source:

L. 73:

RC&RE, p. 1207, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-7-2.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 198, § 3, effective March 24; IP(2)(a) amended, (HB 22-1209), ch. 95, p. 454, § 4, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

Section 8(2) of chapter 95 (HB 22-1209), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1035 (chapter 38) becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1035 or HB 22-1209, whichever is later. HB 22-1035 became law and took effect March 24, 2022, and HB 22-1209 took effect April 12, 2022.

26-11-103. Compensation - expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in section 2-2-326, C.R.S., the members of the commission shall not receive compensation for their services, but they shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties.

Source:

L. 73:

RC&RE, p. 1207, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-7-3.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1965, § 27, effective June 6.

26-11-104. Director - liaison and staff.

Pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, the executive director shall appoint a state department liaison to the commission and administrative staff as necessary to carry out the duties of the position. The state department liaison must be professionally qualified to assume the responsibilities of the position, be the primary contact for the commission, and coordinate commission-related duties with the state department and the commission's executive committee described in section 26-11-102 (1).

Subject to available appropriations, the commission, in coordination with the state department, may contract with a third-party organization to serve as independent staff to the commission in order to coordinate with the state department liaison and the liaison's staff, provide administrative support for the commission's purpose and duties, and carry out other functions the commission assigns.

The commission may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section to support general operations, special projects, research, and staffing needs.

Source:

L. 73:

RC&RE, p. 1207, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-7-4.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 200, § 4, effective March 24.

26-11-105. Duties of commission - report.

The commission, through its executive committee described in section 26-11-102 (1); in coordination with the state department liaison to the commission, appointed pursuant to section 26-11-104; and in coordination with independent staff, contracted pursuant to section 26-11-104, shall carry out the following duties:

Serve as the principal advocacy body in the state on behalf of older Coloradans, including but not limited to participating as an advisor in the development and consideration of legislation and regulations made by state and federal departments and agencies relating to programs and services that affect older Coloradans;

Coordinate and implement the strategic action plan on aging recommendations, developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to June 30, 2022, and additional recommendations the commission makes;

Conduct and encourage private and nonprofit organizations and state, regional, and local government agencies to conduct research and analysis related to the state's aging population;

Assist governmental and private agencies to coordinate their efforts on behalf of older Coloradans in order that such efforts be effective and that duplication and waste of effort be eliminated;

Promote and aid in the establishment of federal, state, regional, and local policies, programs, and services that support and empower older Coloradans and their caregivers, who are either paid or unpaid. The commission shall assist governmental and private agencies by designing surveys that may be used at the local, regional, or state level to determine needs of older people; by recommending the creation or modification of policies, programs, and services to meet identified needs; by collection and distribution of information on aging; and by assisting public and private organizations in all ways the commission may deem appropriate.

Conduct promotional activities and programs of public education relevant to aging;

Review existing policies and programs across state agencies, and on or before September 1, 2023, and on or before September 1 each year thereafter, draft an annual report of issues and recommendations developed by the commission that support the implementation of strategies in alignment with the strategic action plan on aging developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to June 30, 2022, the lifelong Colorado initiative created pursuant to section 26-11-302, and other recommendations that the commission makes. The commission shall submit the annual report to the governor, executive directors of impacted agencies, and the general assembly.

Identify and make recommendations to impacted state agencies on acute concerns impacting older Coloradans that arise due to public health emergencies, natural disasters, historical disparities such as racism, or other issues tied directly to current events that require immediate problem solving and advocacy;

Contribute directly to additional and ongoing analysis and implementation of the strategic plan on aging developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406 and aligned with the lifelong Colorado initiative established in part 3 of this article 11; and

Develop legislative and administrative proposals in coordination with state department liaisons and legislative designees and coordinate advocacy efforts with appropriate community stakeholders.

Source:

L. 73:

RC&RE, p. 1207, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-7-5.

L. 85:

(1)(f) added, p. 975, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(g) added, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, p. 3085, § 8, effective July 6.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 200, § 5, effective March 24; (1)(b) and (1)(g) amended, (HB 22-1209), ch. 95, p. 454, § 5, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

Section 8(2) of chapter 95 (HB 22-1209), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1035 (chapter 38) becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1035 or HB 22-1209, whichever is later. HB 22-1035 became law and took effect March 24, 2022, and HB 22-1209 took effect April 12, 2022.

26-11-106. Gifts - grants.

The state department, acting for and on behalf of the state, may receive and accept title to any grant or gift from any source, including the federal government, and all grants, grants-in-aid, and gifts shall be deposited with the state treasurer and shall be continuously available to the state department to carry out the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 73:

RC&RE, p. 1207, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-7-6.